District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.25

Prosecutions.

(a)

Criminal prosecutions for violations of this chapter shall be brought by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia.

(b)

In any prosecution initiated pursuant to this chapter, a person or entity claiming an exemption from a licensing or certification requirement of this chapter shall have the burden of proving entitlement to the exemption.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 26, 56 DCR 1167